Utah statutes.
10-1-110.   Continuation of prior law.
The provisions of this act insofar as they are the same or substantially the
same as those of any prior statute shall be construed as a continuation of the
prior statute and not as a new enactment. If any other statutory reference is
made to an act of the Legislature or a section of such an act, which is
continued in this act, the reference shall be held to refer to the act or
section thereof so continued in this act.
